nouns.che.lexd
LEXICON NounAbs
абажур
абзац
абиссинец
абиссинка
абонемент
абонент
аборт
абстракци
абхазец
абхазка
авангард
аванс
авантюра
авантюрист
авари
авгол
август
авиатор
авиаци
аврал
авсал
авст
австралиец
австралийка
австриец
австрийка
автобус
автомат
автоматчик
автомобиль
автономи
автор
агент
агентство
агентура
агитатор
агитаци
агрегат
агресси
агрессивность
агрессор
агроном
агрономи
адам
адвокат
аджарец
аджарка
администраци
адмирал
адрес
адъютант
адыгеец
адыгейка
аз
азале
азербайджанец
азербайджанка
азот
айам
aйгӀap
айкх
айла
айма
айп
айр
академи
акаци
акварель
аквариум
аккорд
аккордеон
акт
актeр
актив
активист
активистка
актриса
акула
акустика
акушeр
акушерка
акци
акционер
албанец
албанка
алгебра
алебастр
алкоголизм
алкоголик
алкоголь
алкханч
АллахӀ
аллей
алфавит
альбом
альманах
альпинизм
альпинист
альпинистка
алюминий
амалт
амбар
амбулатори
американец
американка
аммиак
амнисти
амортизаци
ампер
амфибрахи
ан
анализ
ананас
анапест
анархи
анархизм
ангали
англичанин
англичанка
анкета
ансамбль
ант
антенна
антоним
антракт
антрацит
антрополог
антропологи
апельсин
аппарат
аппендицит
аппетит
апрель
аптека
аптечка
арбитр
арбитраж
арван
арданг
аренда
арз
ари
аристократ
аристократи
арифметика
аркхо
арс
артель
артиллери
артист
артистка
архаизм
археолог
археологи
архив
архипелаг
архитектор
архитектура
арц
аса
асар
аспирант
аспирантура
ассамблей
ассимиляци
ассистент
ассистентка
ассоциаци
астма
астроном
астрономи
атака
атлан
атлас
атмосфера
атом
атомоход
атташе
аттестат
аудитори
аукцион
афганец
афганка
аферист
аферистка
африканец
африканка
ахк
ахкарг
ахча
аьлха
аьлча
аьнгалха
аьрзу
аьрша
аьста
аьтто
аьхке
аьшкал
багаж
бад
бажа
базис
байка
баймакх
байракх
байт
байто
бак
баккхал
баклажан
бактери
бактериологи
бакъе
бал
баланс
балба
балг
балда
балерина
балет
балкон
баллада
балласт
баллон
бамба
банан
банда
банк
банка
банкет
банкир
банкрот
баппа
барак
барам
баргал
баргол
барз
барзакъ
барин
баритон
баркалла
барни
барометр
баррикада
бархӀанча
барч
басе
басма
басни
бастион
бат
батальон
батарей
батист
баттам
бахтар
бахьана
бацилла
башкир
башкирка
башлакх
башлам
башмакх
баӀ
баӀар
баьлча
баьхьа
баьчча
беда
бедар
бежана
без
бекх
бел
белорус
белоруска
белхи
белхьам
белш
бен
бензин
бер
бера
берд
берданка
беркат
бертиг
берч
бесни
бехк
бехказло
библиотека
билгало
билет
билзиг
бинт
биографи
биологи
бираьнчиг
биргӀа
бирдо
биссектриса
биток
биши
биъсаберг
блок
блокнот
бо
бог
бод
бож
божал
боз
бозбуунча
бой
бокх
бол
болх
больница
большевизм
большевик
бомба
боргӀал
борец
борз
борт
борц
борш
боршам
борщ
бос
босбуург
ботаник
ботаника
ботинок
ботт
бохча
бохь
бочка
бошто
бошхап
боьлла
брак
браковщик
браковщица
браунинг
брезент
бригада
бригадир
броневик
брошюра
бугӀа
буй
букварь
букет
букъ
була
булавка
булка
бульвар
бумаьштиг
бумбари
бумзи
бун
бунт
буппӀаз
бурак
буракъ
бурам
буржал
буржуази
буржуй
бурса
буру
бурч
бустам
бута
буто
буфет
буфетчик
буфетчица
бух
бухгалтер
бухка
бухӀа
буц
буьйдиг
буьйр
буьйра
буьйса
буька
буьнжо
буьрка
буьртиг
буьччалг
былина
бытие
бюджет
бюллетень
бюрократ
бюрократизм
бӀа
бӀал
бӀар
бӀарза
бӀарлагӀа
бӀаьлланг
бӀаьрг
бӀаьрмециг
бӀаьсте
бӀаьца
бӀаьштиг
бӀе
бӀиж
бӀo
бӀоба
бӀов
бӀо
бӀоржам
бӀоста
бӀотӀа
вагон
вагонетка
ваз
ваза
вазелин
вал
валти
вальс
валюта
ванда
ванна
варвар
варе
варени
варзап
варкхал
варкъ
варш
вас
васт
васхал
вахта
вахтeр
ваӀда
вед
векал
велосипед
веназ
венгерка
венгр
верстак
вeрстка
верта
вершок
весет
вескет
весовщик
весовщица
вета
ветчалг
вечер
взвод
вид
винт
вир
вирд
вклад
вкладчик
вкладчица
вовхатар
водолаз
водопровод
водород
военком
вокзал
воккхаха
волейбол
ворда
ворот
ворта
вота
вотанча
воттана
воӀ
втуз
вуз
вулкан
вывеска
выговор
вымпел
выставка
вышка
га
газ
газет
газификаци
газопровод
гай
гайка
гайшиг
галантерей
галерей
галифе
галстук
галц
гараж
гарза
гарнизон
гарс
гастроль
гата
гaxӀаp
гаъ
гаьззу
гаьнгали
гвардеец
гварди
ге
гегемони
гезг
гезгмаша
гектар
гел
гелий
генерал
гений
географи
геодези
геолог
геологи
геометри
герб
гергарло
герз
герка
герма
герой
гиба
гибрид
гибридизаци
гигиена
гидравлика
гижу
гийзаг
гила
гилдиг
гильза
гимн
гимнаст
гимнастика
гимнастка
гинсу
гипербола
гипноз
гипнотизeр
гипнотизм
гипотеза
гипотенуза
гипс
гирда
гирз
гитара
гитарист
гитаристка
гиччо
глагол
глобус
го
говзанча
говр
гонорар
гонорей
гора
горгали
горгам
горизонт
горком
горн
горнист
горняк
городок
горчица
госпиталь
гостиница
готовальни
градус
градусник
гражданин
гражданка
грамм
грамматика
граммофон
грамота
граната
гранит
графа
график
графин
грейдер
грек
грелка
гречанка
гречиха
грузовик
группа
гу
гудок
гужам
гyй
гул
гулам
гулмаьнда
гуманизм
гуманист
гурма
гурманча
гуьбарчик
гуьзалг
гуьйре
гуьла
гуьмалг
гӀа
гӀабуц
гӀaгӀa
гӀагӀал
гӀад
гӀаж
гӀаз
гӀайба
гӀаймакх
гӀайракх
гӀайре
гӀайси
гӀаккхарг
гӀакх
гӀала
гӀам
гӀаммагӀа
гӀaн
гӀант
гӀaп
гӀapa
гӀарбаш
гӀарбу
гӀapгӀa
гӀаргӀули
гӀарлу
гӀарт
гӀаттам
гӀе
гӀий
гӀийбат
гӀиллакх
гӀина
гӀир
гӀиргӀа
гӀирс
гӀирт
гӀов
гӀовгӀа
гӀовла
гӀовтал
гӀoгӀ
гӀодам
гӀодаюкъ
гӀола
гӀонжагӀa
гӀордаз
гӀорза
гӀоьнча
гӀу
гӀугӀ
гӀудалкх
гӀуй
гӀулг
гӀуллакх
гӀулч
гӀумгӀа
гӀурба
гӀуркх
гӀурма
гӀypт
гӀурчо
гӀутакх
гӀучӀа
дабагӀа
дагестанец
дагӀ
дадо
дак
дактиль
дакх
дама
дамка
дарба
дарбанча
даре
дарж
дарс
дарта
дарц
дахьар
даш
даӀ
даьндарг
даьтта
даьттах
даьхни
даьӀахк
дебет
дебитор
девзиг
девиз
дегайовхо
дeготь
деградаци
дегӀ
дезертир
дезинфекци
декабрист
декабрь
декада
декадент
декан
деканат
деклараци
декрет
делегат
делегатка
делегаци
делкъе
демилитаризаци
демократ
демократи
демократизм
депо
депресси
держава
дерз
дерт
дестин
десятник
дети
детсад
дефис
дефицит
дециметр
дечиг
деши
джемпер
диагноз
диагональ
диалектизм
диалектика
диалектологи
диалог
диаметр
диапазон
диапозитив
диван
диверсант
диверси
дивизи
дивизион
диг
диета
дизель
дизентери
дийнат
диктант
диктатура
диктор
дилха
динамика
динамит
динберг
динбухка
дингад
диплом
дипломат
дипломати
директива
директор
дирста
дирша
дискусси
диссертант
диссертаци
дитт
дифтерит
дифтонг
дневник
до
доброволец
дов
дог
дога
догма
догматизм
договор
догпах
догӀа
докер
доклад
докладчик
доктор
документ
дол
долма
доминион
домино
досбух
доска
дохк
дохкана
доцент
дош
доӀа
доӀах
доьхка
драма
драматург
драматурги
драп
дредноут
дрезина
дрейф
дробь
дружина
дубликат
дуй
дукъ
дукъарц
дукъу
дума
дундал
дур
дургал
дуушто
духовка
духӀи
душ
дуэль
дуэт
дуьне
дуьхьало
дуьхьло
дӀа
дӀаьндарг
дӀовш
дӀуьтӀа
еара
европеец
европейка
египтянин
египтянка
ез
ей
естествознани
етт
ефрейтор
ехк
жа
жагӀа
жагӀжагӀа
жагӀнакх
жайна
жакет
жале
жамбалт
жамӀ
жамӀат
жана
жандарм
жанр
жансу
жанта
жаргон
жаргӀа
жарж
жасмин
жахар
жаӀар
жаӀу
желудочек
живописец
жижи
жижиг
жий
жим
жимха
жин
жир
жираф
жиргӀа
жовхӀар
жоммагӀа
жоп
жо
жуз
жуккар
жулар
журнал
журналист
журналистка
жут
жухарг
жуьжап
жуьрг
жюри
жӀакки
жӀаьла
жӀов
жӀовни
жӀож
жӀолам
жӀонка
жӀормак
жӀу
за
забастовка
забба
забой
забойщик
забур
заведующи
завод
завхоз
загс
загӀа
задача
задачник
задник
заeм
зажигалка
заза
зайл
зайла
заказ
заказчик
закат
закон
закъалт
зал
залог
залп
замазка
заместитель
заметка
занжабил
заняти
заочник
заочница
запятой
заряд
зарядка
заседани
заседатель
заслуга
зачeт
защита
заявка
заявлени
заӀпар
заьзга
заьлгӀа
звено
звеньевой
зверинец
зез
зе
зени
зенитчик
зенитчица
зил
зингат
зип
зирх
зиярт
значок
зовкх
зо
зоолог
зоологи
зорба
зорбанча
зорх
зу
зуд
зудабе
зуз
зулам
зурма
зурманча
зуьгалг
зуькар
зӀа
зӀе
зӀенар
зӀийдиг
зӀиймарг
зӀок
зӀокберг
зӀо
зӀу
идеализаци
идеализм
идеалист
идей
идеолог
идеологи
идиома
ижу
изолятор
изоляци
ийман
иймансиз
илли
иллюстраци
имам
иммигрант
иммиграци
император
импери
империализм
инарла
инвалид
инвентаризаци
инверси
ингалс
индеец
индианка
индиец
индонезиец
индонезийка
индус
индуска
индустри
инерци
инженер
инжил
инжир
инкарло
инкубатор
инспектор
инспекци
инстанци
институт
инструктаж
инструктор
инструкци
инструмент
интеллигенци
интендант
интервент
интервенци
интервью
интернат
инфляци
информаци
иргӀу
ирзу
ирко
ирригаци
ирс
ирхе
искаьртик
искогберг
искусство
ислам
испанец
испанка
исполком
иссанча
истанг
истори
историк
исхар
итальянец
итальянка
итог
иттанча
иту
ичмик
ишал
ишар
ишкап
июль
июнь
йиз
йий
йийбар
йийсар
йилбаз
йилгӀа
йиппар
йир
йис
йитаб
йиш
йиша
йовлакх
йовсар
йовхатар
йовхо
йо
йокъа
йол
йоргӀа
йорт
йоӀ
йоӀчӀаьжг
йоьхь
кабель
кабина
кабинет
кагту
кад
кадам
кадр
казак
казарма
казах
казачка
какао
кактус
календарь
калибр
кало
калцӀо
калька
калькуляци
каменщик
камера
кампани
канализаци
кандидат
кандидатура
канцеляри
капа
капитал
капитализм
капиталист
капитан
капитуляци
капсюль
карабин
каракалпак
карел
карелка
карзахалла
карикатура
карнавал
карниз
карп
карс
карсол
карта
картол
картолг
картон
картотека
карточка
карьер
карьера
карьерист
карьеристка
каска
касса
кассаци
кассир
кассирша
каста
каталог
катар
катастрофа
категори
катер
катет
катод
каторга
каторжанин
каторжник
каучук
кафе
кафедра
кахьар
кач
каш
кашемир
каштан
каюта
каьрдиг
квадрат
квартал
квартет
кварц
квас
квитанци
кевстиг
ке
кедр
кемпет
кемс
кенаф
кенгуру
кеп
кепек
кепка
керамика
керосинка
керста
керт
кес
кетар
кибарчиг
кийра
кийтарло
кило
киловатт
килограмм
километр
килс
килька
кинематографи
кино
киоск
кипарис
кир
кира
киранча
киртиг
кирхьа
кирша
кисель
кисет
кислород
кислота
кит
китаец
китаянка
китель
кица
кишлак
кишма
кладовой
кладовщик
кладовщица
класс
классик
классицизм
клевер
клеeнка
клетка
клизма
клика
климат
клиника
клуб
клюква
книга
книжка
кнопка
ко
коалици
ковра
ковст
ког
кодекс
кож
козырь
кокос
кокс
кол
колба
колд
коллеги
коллегиальность
коллектив
коллективизаци
коллективизм
коллекци
колони
колонизaци
колонист
колонка
колонна
колхоз
колхозник
колхозница
команда
командарм
командир
командовани
комар
комбайн
комбайнер
комбайнерка
комбинат
комбинезон
комбриг
комдив
комеди
комендант
комендатура
комета
Коминтерн
комиссар
комисси
комитет
комментари
коммерци
коммуна
коммунар
коммунизм
коммунист
коммутатор
коммюнике
комод
компани
компас
комплекс
комплект
композитор
композици
компостер
компот
компресс
комсомол
комсомолец
комсомолка
комсорг
комсостав
конвейер
конвенци
конверт
конвой
конгресс
кондар
кондитер
кондуктор
конкуренци
конкурс
консерватизм
консилиум
конспект
конституци
консультаци
контакт
контейнер
контингент
континент
контрабанда
контраст
контрибуци
контролeр
контрудар
контур
конус
конференци
конфискаци
концентрат
концентраци
концерн
концерт
концесси
коньяк
кооператив
коопераци
координата
копи
кор
коралл
кореец
кореянка
коржам
корифей
королева
король
корпораци
корпус
корректив
корректор
корректура
корсам
корсет
корта
кортали
косказ
космонавт
космополитизм
космос
кост
костюм
косынка
котик
котлет
кофейник
кофта
кохка
коч
кочегар
краб
краевед
краеведени
край
кран
кратер
крахмал
кредит
кредитор
крейсер
крем
крематори
кремль
крепдешин
крепильщик
кризис
кристалл
критик
критика
кролик
кросс
кроссворд
кружка
кружок
куб
кубик
кубок
куз
куй
кулак
кулинар
кулинарка
культ
культиватор
культиваци
культура
куп
купе
купец
куплет
купчиха
кур
курорт
курпал
курсант
курсантка
курсовка
курх
курьер
кухни
куц
кучер
куьг
куьзга
куьлла
куьрза
куьрк
кхаанча
кхаара
кхакха
кханча
кхарта
кхахь
кхахьам
кхаъ
кхел
кхелли
кхерч
кхес
кхиам
кхийриг
кхимар
кхо
кхоам
кхоберг
кхов
кховра
кхоког
кхокха
кхолго
кхоллам
кхолхо
кхор
кхосаберг
кхоткъа
кхошай
кхункх
къа
къайле
къам
къамел
къамкъарг
къахь
къахьо
къахьшту
къаьндал
къаьркъа
къерсиг
къиг
къийзиг
къийзорг
къийлор
къилба
къилбе
къилбсе
къинхе
къинхье
къо
къовлам
къонза
къоршкъали
къу
къубба
къулла
къурд
къуркъал
къуръан
къух
къуьда
къуьлг
къуьрдиг
кӀа
кӀабуц
кӀаг
кӀайдарг
кӀалд
кӀант
кӀаркӀар
кӀарх
кӀац
кӀе
кӀеж
кӀелхьардиг
кӀес
кӀир
кӀира
кӀиранде
кӀозйо
кӀомар
кӀомсар
кӀора
кӀорлагӀа
кӀормода
кӀорни
кӀохцал
кӀохцалг
кӀошт
кӀудал
кӀуж
кӀужал
кӀунзал
кӀур
кӀурам
кӀурз
кӀуркӀмани
кӀус
лаам
лаба
лабиализаци
лаборант
лаборантка
лаборатори
лагерь
ладар
лазартни
лай
лак
лакхе
лам
лампа
лан
лаппагӀа
лард
ларча
ластик
латыш
латышка
лауреат
лахе
лахьа
лахьорч
лахьта
лаьнгар
лаьнкӀа
лаьхьа
левси
левшик
ледарло
ледокол
лезгин
лейкоцит
лейтенант
лексика
лектор
лектори
лекци
лекъ
лекъжиг
ленинец
ленинизм
лента
лерг
лергъя
лeтчик
лeтчица
либерал
либерализм
ликвидатор
лила
лилбаз
лимон
лимонад
лингвист
лингвистика
линкор
липпар
лирика
литейщик
литератор
литература
литовец
литовка
литр
лифчик
